Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3958.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 306.991, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Animals. new text end new text begin (a) A public cemetery may allow a domesticated dog or cat that is normally maintained in or near the household of the dog's or cat's owner, or a chicken, that is deceased no more than 72 hours before the burial to be buried with a human body if the burial requirements under this section are met and the dog, cat, or chicken: new text end new text begin (1) is not embalmed; new text end new text begin (2) is enclosed in (i) a biodegradable casket or shroud with the human body, or (ii) a separate biodegradable container or shroud; and new text end new text begin (3) is not buried or enclosed in a vault or outer burial container. new text end new text begin (b) A public cemetery may allow the cremated remains of a domesticated dog or cat that is normally maintained in or near the household of the dog's or cat's owner, or a chicken, to be buried with a human body or human cremated remains if the cremated remains of the dog, cat, or chicken are in a biodegradable container or shroud. new text end new text begin (c) A chicken being buried consistent with this subdivision is exempt from the requirements under Minnesota Rules, parts 1721.0690 to 1721.0740. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 307.14, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Animals. new text end new text begin (a) A private cemetery may allow a domesticated dog or cat that is normally maintained in or near the household of the dog's or cat's owner, or a chicken, that is deceased no more than 72 hours before the burial to be buried with a human body if the burial requirements under this section are met and the dog, cat, or chicken: new text end new text begin (1) is not embalmed; new text end new text begin (2) is enclosed in (i) a biodegradable casket or shroud, or (ii) a separate biodegradable container or shroud; and new text end new text begin (3) is not buried or enclosed in a vault or outer burial container. new text end new text begin (b) A private cemetery may allow the cremated remains of a domesticated dog or cat that is normally maintained in or near the household of the dog's or cat's owner, or a chicken, to be buried with a human body or human cremated remains if the cremated remains of the dog, cat, or chicken are in a biodegradable container or shroud. new text end new text begin (c) A chicken being buried consistent with this subdivision is exempt from the requirements under Minnesota Rules, parts 1721.0690 to 1721.0740. new text end